Utah statutes.
59-10-104.   Tax basis -- Tax rate -- Exemption.
(1)  For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2008, a tax is imposed
on the state taxable income of a resident individual as provided in this
section.
(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1), for a taxable year, the tax is an amount
equal to the product of:
(a)  the resident individual's state taxable income for that taxable year; and
(b)  5%.
(3)  This section does not apply to a resident individual exempt from taxation
under Section 59-10-104.1.
